District of Columbia statutes.
1-327.53

Transfers.

(a)

All of the authority, responsibilities, duties, and functions of the agencies’ call centers and radio technology shall be transferred from the agencies to the Office of Unified Communications within such reasonable period of time as the Mayor may designate. The transfer shall include all 911, 311, and 727-1000 call center authority, responsibilities, duties, functions, and infrastructure.

(b)

All vacant and filled positions, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the agencies to perform the functions set forth in § 1-327.54 shall be transferred to the Office of Unified Communications within such reasonable period of time as the Mayor may designate.

(c)

The Mayor, or the Mayor’s designee, may organize the personnel and property transferred to the Office from the agencies into such organizational components as the Mayor or the Mayor’s designee deems appropriate, and may develop any reports and evaluation systems necessary to assess the effectiveness of the reorganization plan authorized by this part.

(d)

All authority and operations related to the Emergency and Non-Emergency Number Telephone Calling Systems Fund, established by § 34-1801, shall be transferred to the Office of Unified Communications.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3204, 51 DCR 8441